New York, session 2025-2026, A1073.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19-0306-b of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 4 no regulation shall be established or enforced relating to the percent- 5 age of zero-emission vehicles in manufacturers' sales fleets of medium- 6 duty and heavy-duty vehicles until the availability of sufficient charg- 7 ing infrastructure, and the cost and availability of zero-emission 8 medium-duty and heavy-duty vehicles makes the sale of zero-emission 9 medium-duty and heavy-duty vehicles more practicable. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02999-01-5